District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.74

POWER — Medical review.

(a)

After the Mayor determines that a TANF applicant or recipient may be considered for POWER eligibility, pursuant to § 4-205.72, the Mayor shall provide a medical review of the applicant or recipient to determine whether the applicant or recipient is incapacitated.

(a-1)

After the Mayor determines that a TANF applicant or recipient may be considered for POWER eligibility, pursuant to § 4-205.72a, the Mayor shall provide a review of the applicant or recipient to determine whether the applicant or recipient is eligible for POWER.

(b)

The applicant or recipient shall cooperate with obtaining the medical review as a condition of eligibility for POWER.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 574
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5162(f), 59 DCR 8025

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.74.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added “pursuant to § 4-205.72” in (a); and added (a-1).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-205.69.

Short Title

Section 5151 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle N of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Time Limit Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 5163 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 5162 shall apply upon certification by the Chief Financial Officer that sufficient revenue is available in the June 2012, September 2012, or December 2012 revenue estimates to fund section 10002(a)(1) and (2)(A) of D.C. Law 19-168.

Section 5152 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-168, § 5163.